Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Article 4. Allocation of Receipts During Administration of Trust

386.466.
“Entity” defined — Character of receipts from entities.

In this section, “entity” means a corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, statutory or business trust, regulated investment company, real estate investment trust, common trust fund, or any other organization in which a trustee has an interest other than a trust or estate to which KRS

386.468

applies.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a trustee shall allocate to income money received from an entity.

A trustee shall allocate the following receipts from an entity to principal:

Property other than money;

Money received in one (1) distribution or a series of related distributions in exchange for part or all of a trust’s interest in the entity;

Money received in total or partial liquidation of the entity; and

Money received from an entity that is a regulated investment company or a real estate investment trust, if the money distributed is a capital gain dividend for federal income tax purposes.

Money is received in partial liquidation:

To the extent that the entity, at or near the time of a distribution, indicates that it is a distribution in partial liquidation; or

If the total amount of money and property received in a distribution or series of related distributions is greater than twenty percent (20%) of the entity’s gross assets, as shown by the entity’s year end financial statements immediately preceding the initial receipt.

Money is not received in partial liquidation, nor may it be taken into account under paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of this section to the extent that it does not exceed the amount of income tax that a trustee or beneficiary shall pay on taxable income of the entity that distributes the money.

A trustee may rely upon a statement made by an entity about the source or character of a distribution if the statement is made at or near the time of distribution by the entity’s board of directors or other person or group of persons authorized to exercise powers to pay money or transfer property comparable to those of a corporation’s board of directors.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 9, effective January 1, 2005; 2010, ch. 133, § 76, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(9/9/2008). The Reviser of Statutes has corrected a manifest clerical or typographical error in subsection (5) of this statute under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(h) by supplying the inadvertently omitted word “tax” after “the amount of income” to conform with the adopted text of the Uniform Principal and Income Act.

386.468.
Distribution from trust or estate.

A trustee shall allocate to income an amount received as a distribution of income from a trust or an estate in which the trust has an interest other than a purchased interest, and shall allocate to principal an amount received as a distribution of principal from such a trust or estate. If a trustee purchases an interest in a trust that is an investment entity, or a decedent or donor transfers an interest in such a trust to a trustee, KRS

386.466

applies to a receipt from the trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 10, effective January 1, 2005.

386.470.
Principal receipts.

A trustee shall allocate to principal:

To the extent not allocated to income under KRS

386.450

to

386.504

, assets received from a transferor during the transferor’s lifetime, a decedent’s estate, a trust with a terminating income interest, or a payer under a contract naming the trust or its trustee as beneficiary;

Money or other property received from the sale, exchange, liquidation, or change in form of a principal asset, including stock splits and realized profit, subject to this article;

Amounts recovered from third parties to reimburse the trust because of disbursements described in KRS 386.492(1)(g) or for other reasons to the extent not based on the loss of income;

Proceeds of property taken by eminent domain, but a separate award made for the loss of income with respect to an accounting period during which a current income beneficiary had a mandatory income interest is income;

Net income received in an accounting period during which there is no beneficiary to whom a trustee may or shall distribute income;

If a trustee grants an option to buy property from the trust, whether or not the trust owns the property when the option is granted, grants an option that permits another person to sell property to the trust, or acquires an option to buy property for the trust or an option to sell an asset owned by the trust, and the trustee or other owner of the asset is required to deliver the asset if the option is exercised, an amount received for granting the option shall be allocated to principal. An amount paid to acquire the option shall be paid from principal. A gain or loss realized upon the exercise of an option, including an option granted to a settlor of the trust for services rendered, shall be allocated to principal; and

Other receipts as provided in KRS

386.478

,

386.480

,

386.482

,

386.484

,

386.486

, and

386.488

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 11, effective January 1, 2005.

386.472.
Receipts from rental property.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from rental property under this section, the trustee shall allocate to income an amount received as rent of real or personal property, including an amount received for cancellation or renewal of a lease. An amount received as a refundable deposit, including a security deposit or a deposit that is applied as rent for future periods, shall be added to principal and held subject to the terms of the lease and is not available for distribution to a beneficiary until the trustee’s contractual obligations have been satisfied with respect to that amount.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 12, effective January 1, 2005.

386.474.
Receipts from obligation to pay money — Exceptions.

An amount received as interest, whether determined at a fixed, variable, or floating rate, on an obligation to pay money to the trustee, including an amount received as consideration for prepaying principal, shall be allocated to income without any provision for amortization of premium.

A trustee shall allocate to principal an amount received from the sale, redemption, or other disposition of an obligation to pay money to the trustee more than one (1) year after it is purchased or acquired by the trustee, including an obligation whose purchase price or value when it is acquired is less than its value at maturity. If the obligation matures within one (1) year after it is purchased or acquired by the trustee, an amount received in excess of its purchase price or its value when acquired by the trust shall be allocated to income.

This section shall not apply to an obligation to which KRS

386.472

,

386.480

,

386.482

,

386.484

, or

386.486

applies.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 13, effective January 1, 2005.

386.476.
Receipts from insurance policies and similar contracts — Exception.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, a trustee shall allocate to principal the proceeds of a life insurance policy or other contract in which the trust or its trustee is named as beneficiary, including a contract that insures the trust or its trustee against loss for damage to, destruction of, or loss of title to a trust asset. The trustee shall allocate dividends on an insurance policy to income if the premiums on the policy are paid from income, and to principal if the premiums are paid from principal.

A trustee shall allocate to income proceeds of a contract that insures the trustee against loss of occupancy or other use by an income beneficiary, loss of income, or loss of profits from a business.

This section shall not apply to a contract to which KRS

386.480

applies.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 14, effective January 1, 2005.

386.478.
Insubstantial allocations not required — When allocation presumed insubstantial.

If a trustee determines that an allocation between principal and income required by KRS

386.480

,

386.482

,

386.484

, or

386.486

is unsubstantial, the trustee may allocate the entire amount to principal. An allocation is presumed to be insubstantial if:

The amount of the allocation would increase or decrease net income in an accounting period, as determined before the allocation, by less than ten percent (10%); or

The value of the asset producing the receipt for which the allocation would be made is less than ten percent (10%) of the total value of the trust’s assets at the beginning of the accounting period.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 15, effective January 1, 2005; 2010, ch. 21, § 13, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 25, § 107, effective July 15, 2014.

386.480.
Receipts from deferred compensation, annuities, and similar payments — Exceptions — Allocations of payments made from a separate fund.

As used in this section:

“Payment” means a payment that a trustee may receive over a fixed number of years or during the life of one (1) or more individuals because of services rendered or property transferred to the payer in exchange for future payments. The term includes a payment made in money or property from the payer’s general assets or from a separate fund created by the payer. For purposes of subsections (4), (5), (6), and (7) of this section, the term also includes any payment from any separate fund, regardless of the reason for the payment; and

“Separate fund” includes a private or commercial annuity, an individual retirement account, and a pension profit-sharing, stock-bonus, or stock-ownership plan.

To the extent that a payment is characterized as interest or a dividend or a payment made in lieu of interest or a dividend, a trustee shall allocate it to income. The trustee shall allocate to principal the balance of the payment and any other payment received in the same accounting period that is not characterized as interest, a dividend, or an equivalent payment.

If no part of a payment is characterized as interest, a dividend, or an equivalent payment and all or part of the payment is required to be made, a trustee shall allocate to income ten percent (10%) of the part that is required to be made during the accounting period and the balance to principal. If no part of a payment is required to be made or the payment received is the entire amount to which the trustee is entitled, the trustee shall allocate the entire payment to principal. For purposes of this subsection, a payment is not “required to be made” to the extent that it is made because the trustee exercises a right of withdrawal.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, subsections (6) and (7) of this section shall apply, and subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not apply, in determining the allocation of a payment made from a separate fund to:

A trust to which an election to qualify for a marital deduction under 26

U.S.C. sec. 2056(b)(7)

has been made; or

A trust that qualifies for the marital deduction under 26

U.S.C. sec. 2056(b)(5)

.

Subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section shall not apply if and to the extent that the series of payments would, without the application of subsection (4) of this section, qualify for the marital deduction under 26 U.S.C sec. 2056(b)(7)(C).

A trustee shall determine the internal income of each separate fund for the accounting period as if the separate fund were a trust subject to KRS

386.450

to

386.504

. Upon request of the surviving spouse, the trustee shall demand that the person administering the separate fund distribute the internal income to the trust. The trustee shall allocate a payment from the separate fund to income to the extent of the internal income of the separate fund and distribute that amount to the surviving spouse. The trustee shall allocate the balance of the payment to principal. Upon request of the surviving spouse, the trustee shall allocate principal to income to the extent the internal income of the separate fund exceeds payments made from the separate fund to the trust during the accounting period.

If a trustee cannot determine the internal income of a separate fund but can determine the value of the separate fund, the internal income of the separate fund is deemed to equal three percent (3%) of the fund’s value, according to the most recent statement of value preceding the beginning of the accounting period. If the trustee can determine neither the internal income of the separate fund nor the fund’s value, the internal income of the fund is deemed to equal the product of the interest rate and the present value of the expected future payments, as determined under 26

U.S.C. sec. 7520

, for the month preceding the accounting period for which the computation is made.

This section shall not apply to payments to which KRS

386.482

applies.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 16, effective January 1, 2005; 2010, ch. 21, § 7, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Hargrove, 2010 Changes to the Kentucky Trust & Estate Practice, Vol. 74, No. 5, September 2010, Ky. Bench & Bar 12.

386.482.
Receipts from liquidating assets.

In this section, “liquidating asset” means an asset whose value will diminish or terminate because the asset is expected to produce receipts for a period of limited duration. The term includes a leasehold, patent, copyright, royalty right, and right to receive payments during a period of more than one (1) year under an arrangement that shall not provide for the payment of interest on the unpaid balance. The term shall not include an activity subject to KRS 386.470(6), payment subject to KRS

386.480

, resources subject to KRS

386.484

, timber subject to KRS

386.486

, or any asset for which the trustee establishes a reserve for depreciation under KRS

386.494

.

A trustee shall allocate to income ten percent (10%) of the receipts from a liquidating asset and the balance to principal.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 17, effective January 1, 2005.

386.484.
Receipts from minerals, water, and other natural resources.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from an interest in minerals or other natural resources pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate them as follows:

If received as nominal delay rental or nominal annual rent on a lease, a receipt shall be allocated to income;

If received from a production payment, a receipt shall be allocated to income if and to the extent that the agreement creating the production payment provides a factor for interest or its equivalent. The balance shall be allocated to principal;

If an amount received as a royalty, shut-in-well payment, take-or-pay payment, bonus, or delay rental is more than nominal, ninety percent (90%) shall be allocated to principal and the balance to income; or

If an amount is received from a working interest or any other interest not provided for in paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, ninety percent (90%) of the net amount received shall be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

An amount received on account of an interest in water that is renewable shall be allocated to income. If the water is not renewable, ninety percent (90%) of the amount shall be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

KRS

386.450

to

386.504

apply whether or not a decedent or donor was extracting minerals, water, or other natural resources before the interest became subject to the trust.

If a trust owns an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources on January 1, 2005, the trustee may allocate receipts from the interest as provided in KRS

386.450

to

386.504

or in the manner used by the trustee before January 1, 2005. If the trust acquires an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources after January 1, 2005, the trustee shall allocate receipts from the interest as provided in KRS

386.450

to

386.504

.

The proceeds from any disposition of an interest specified in this section shall be allocated in the same manner as receipts from the interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 18, effective January 1, 2005.

386.486.
Receipts from timber.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from the sale of timber and related products pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate the net receipts:

To income to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land does not exceed the rate of growth of the timber during the accounting periods in which a beneficiary has a mandatory income interest;

To principal to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land exceeds the rate of growth of the timber or the net receipts are from the sale of standing timber;

To or between income and principal if the net receipts are from the lease of timberland or from a contract to cut timber from land owned by a trust, by determining the amount of timber removed from the land under the lease or contract and applying the rules in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection; or

To principal to the extent that advance payments, bonuses, and other payments are not allocated pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

In determining net receipts allocated under subsection (1) of this section, a trustee shall deduct and transfer to principal a reasonable amount for depletion.

KRS

386.450

to

386.504

apply whether or not a decedent or transferor was harvesting timber from the property before it became subject to the trust.

If a trust owns an interest in timberland on January 1, 2005, the trustee may allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in KRS

386.450

to

386.504

or in the manner used by the trustee before January 1, 2005. If the trust acquires an interest in timberland after January 1, 2005, the trustee shall allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in KRS

386.450

to

386.504

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 19, effective January 1, 2005.

386.488.
Property not productive of income.

If a marital deduction is allowed for all or part of a trust, the spouse may require the trustee to make the trust income productive.

In cases not governed by subsection (1) of this section, proceeds from the sale or other disposition of an asset are principal without regard to the amount of income the asset produces during any accounting period.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 158, § 20, effective January 1, 2005.